apertium-nap.nap.dix
    <pardef n="/essere__vblex">
      <!--Indicativo - Indicative-->
      <e><p><l>songo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>so'</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sì'</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>è</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>é</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>site</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>songo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>so'</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ero</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ire</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èramo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ìreve</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>erano</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>fuje</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fuste</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fuje</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fùjemo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fùremo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fùsteve</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fùjeno</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="psti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sarràgio</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarraje</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrà</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrâmmo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarràte</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrànno</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>so' stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>so' stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>so' stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pni"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>era stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>era stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ero stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ero stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ero stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èramo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èramo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èramo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ppi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sarràggio stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftip"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarràggio stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftip"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarràggio stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftip"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrâmmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftip"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrâmmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftip"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sarrâmmo state</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftip"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
      <!--Congiuntivo - Subjunctive-->
      <e><p><l>sia</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sì'</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sie</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>simmo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>site</l>		<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siano</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>fosse</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fusse</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fosse</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fossemo</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fùsseve</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fosseno</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>sia stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pts"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pts"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sia stato</l>	<r>essere<s n="n"/><s n="vblex"/><s n="pts"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="essere">	    <i></i><par n="/essere__vblex"/></e>
